Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.010

Composition of committee.

The governor or the governor's designee, the lieutenant governor, the secretary of state, and the commissioner of public lands, ex officio, shall constitute the state capitol committee.

[ 1997 c 279 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 57 s 10; 1965 c 8 s 43.34.010. Prior: 1961 c 300 s 5; 1921 c 7 s 8; RRS s 10766.]